test/src/dict-gt-yamls/V-vaktw_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Verb - vakțõ: # Verb 31 'eng /est valvata/fin' - full paradigm
     vakțõ+V+Inf: vakțõ
     vakțõ+V+Ger: vakțõs
     vakțõ+V+Sup: vakțõm
     vakțõ+V+Sup+Ine: vakțõmõs
     vakțõ+V+Sup+Ela: vakțõmõst
     vakțõ+V+Sup+Tra: vakțõmõks
     vakțõ+V+Sup+Abe: vakțõmõt
     vakțõ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: vakțūb
     vakțõ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: vakțõt
     vakțõ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: vakțūbõd
     vakțõ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: vakțīz
     vakțõ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: [vakțīzt, vakțīztõ]
     vakțõ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [vakțīzt, vakțīztõ]
     vakțõ+V+Ind+ConNeg+Sg: vakț
     vakțõ+V+Cond+Sg3: vakțõks
     vakțõ+V+Imprt+Sg2: vakț
     vakțõ+V+Imprt+ConNeg+Sg2: vakț
     vakțõ+V+Imprt+Pl2: vakțõgid
     vakțõ+V+Jus+Sg3: vakțõg
     vakțõ+V+Quo+Sg3: vakțiji
     vakțõ+V+ActPrfPrc: vakțõn
     vakțõ+V+PssPrfPrc: vakțõd
